Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1214.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin WASHINGTON AVENUE BRIDGE SUICIDE PREVENTION.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.993, subdivision 2, from funds received under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.993, Hennepin County must award a grant of $15,000,000 to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to design and construct suicide barriers and provide suicide diversion information resources on the Washington Avenue Bridge in the city of Minneapolis. new text end